Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-12,253
Grant recipient; reports; contents; household recipient; provide information.

(1) Each grant recipient shall provide semiannual reports to the department with the following data regarding new taxpayer recruitment program outcomes:

(a) Total number of applications received from households;

(b) Total number of approved applications for incentives;

(c) The incentive provided to each approved household;

(d) The annual income and occupation of each individual from an approved household; and

(e) The estimated economic impact of the new taxpayer recruitment program, including state and local tax revenue and new consumer spending.

(2) Each household that receives an incentive from a new taxpayer recruitment program funded by a grant under the New Taxpayer Recruitment Grant Act shall provide the grant recipient that provided an incentive to such household with the information that is reasonably necessary to complete the semiannual reports required under this section. Grant recipients may rely in good faith on such household information for purposes of completing semiannual reports.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 113.
July 18, 2026